Washington statutes.
RCW 15.115.150

Director's duties.

(1) The commission shall develop and submit to the director for approval any plans, programs, and projects concerning the following:

(a) The establishment, issuance, effectuation, and administration of appropriate programs or projects for the advertising and promotion of wheat and barley; and

(b) The establishment and effectuation of market research projects, market development projects, or both, to the end that the marketing and utilization of wheat and barley may be encouraged, expanded, improved, or made more efficient.

(2) The director shall review the commission's advertising or promotion program to ensure that no false claims are being made concerning any agricultural commodity.

(3) The commission, prior to the beginning of its fiscal year, shall prepare and submit to the director for approval its research plan, its commodity-related education and training plan, and its budget on a fiscal period basis.

(4) The director shall review and make a determination of all submissions described in this section in a timely manner.

[ 2009 c 33 s 15.]